Illinois, session 104th, HB1288.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 29-15 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/29-15)  (from Ch. 46, par. 29-15)7    Sec. 29-15. Conviction deemed infamous. Except as 8otherwise provided in subsection (b-6) of Section 5-5-5 of the 9Unified Code of Corrections, any Any person convicted of an 10infamous crime as such term is defined in Section 124-1 of the 11Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963, as amended, shall 12thereafter be prohibited from holding any office of honor, 13trust, or profit, unless such person is again restored to such 14rights by the terms of a pardon for the offense, has received a 15restoration of rights by the Governor, or otherwise according 16to law. Any time after a judgment of conviction is rendered, a 17person convicted of an infamous crime may petition the 18Governor for a restoration of rights.19    The changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of 20the 102nd General Assembly are declarative of existing law. 21(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21.) 22    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by   HB1288- 2 -LRB104 07349 RLC 17389 b1changing Section 3.1-10-5 as follows: 2    (65 ILCS 5/3.1-10-5)  (from Ch. 24, par. 3.1-10-5)3    Sec. 3.1-10-5. Qualifications; elective office. 4    (a) A person is not eligible for an elective municipal 5office unless that person is a qualified elector of the 6municipality and has resided in the municipality at least one 7year next preceding the election or appointment, except as 8provided in Section 3.1-20-25, subsection (b) of Section 93.1-25-75, Section 5-2-2, or Section 5-2-11.10    (b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b-6) of 11Section 5-5-5 of the Unified Code of Corrections, a A person is 12not eligible to take the oath of office for a municipal office 13if that person is, at the time required for taking the oath of 14office, in arrears in the payment of a tax or other 15indebtedness due to the municipality or has been convicted in 16any court located in the United States of any infamous crime, 17bribery, perjury, or other felony, unless such person is again 18restored to his or her rights of citizenship that may have been 19forfeited under Illinois law as a result of a conviction, 20which includes eligibility to hold elected municipal office, 21by the terms of a pardon for the offense, has received a 22restoration of rights by the Governor, or otherwise according 23to law. Any time after a judgment of conviction is rendered, a 24person convicted of an infamous crime, bribery, perjury, or 25other felony may petition the Governor for a restoration of   HB1288- 3 -LRB104 07349 RLC 17389 b1rights.2    The changes made to this subsection by this amendatory Act 3of the 102nd General Assembly are declarative of existing law 4and apply to all persons elected at the April 4, 2017 5consolidated election and to persons elected or appointed 6thereafter.7    (b-5) (Blank). 8    (c) A person is not eligible for the office of alderperson 9of a ward unless that person has resided in the ward that the 10person seeks to represent, and a person is not eligible for the 11office of trustee of a district unless that person has resided 12in the municipality, at least one year next preceding the 13election or appointment, except as provided in Section 143.1-20-25, subsection (b) of Section 3.1-25-75, Section 5-2-2, 15or Section 5-2-11.16    (d) If a person (i) is a resident of a municipality 17immediately prior to the active duty military service of that 18person or that person's spouse, (ii) resides anywhere outside 19of the municipality during that active duty military service, 20and (iii) immediately upon completion of that active duty 21military service is again a resident of the municipality, then 22the time during which the person resides outside the 23municipality during the active duty military service is deemed 24to be time during which the person is a resident of the 25municipality for purposes of determining the residency 26requirement under subsection (a).   HB1288- 4 -LRB104 07349 RLC 17389 b1(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21.) 2    Section 15. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 3changing Section 5-5-5 as follows: 4    (730 ILCS 5/5-5-5)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1005-5-5)5    Sec. 5-5-5. Loss and restoration of rights. 6    (a) Conviction and disposition shall not entail the loss 7by the defendant of any civil rights, except under this 8Section and Sections 29-6 and 29-10 of The Election Code, as 9now or hereafter amended.10    (b) A person convicted of a felony shall be ineligible to 11hold an office created by the Constitution of this State until 12the completion of his sentence.13    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person 14convicted of a felony, bribery, perjury, or other infamous 15crime for an offense committed on or after the effective date 16of this amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly and 17committed while he or she was serving as a public official in 18this State is ineligible to hold any local public office or any 19office created by the Constitution of this State unless the 20person's conviction is reversed, the person is again restored 21to such rights by the terms of a pardon for the offense, the 22person has received a restoration of rights by the Governor, 23or the person's rights are otherwise restored by law.24    (b-6) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b-5) and   HB1288- 5 -LRB104 07349 RLC 17389 b1notwithstanding any other law, a person convicted of a felony, 2after the completion of his or her sentence, including the 3completion of his or her parole or mandatory supervised 4release term, shall be eligible to be nominated for, and 5elected to, an elective public office. As used in this 6subsection (b-6), "elective public office" means an office for 7which a person is elected that has been created by the 8Constitution of this State, a law of this State, or a county or 9municipal ordinance or referendum. 10    (c) A person sentenced to imprisonment shall lose his 11right to vote until released from imprisonment.12    (d) On completion of sentence of imprisonment or upon 13discharge from probation, conditional discharge or periodic 14imprisonment, or at any time thereafter, all license rights 15and privileges granted under the authority of this State which 16have been revoked or suspended because of conviction of an 17offense shall be restored unless the authority having 18jurisdiction of such license rights finds after investigation 19and hearing that restoration is not in the public interest. 20This paragraph (d) shall not apply to the suspension or 21revocation of a license to operate a motor vehicle under the 22Illinois Vehicle Code.23    (e) Upon a person's discharge from incarceration or 24parole, or upon a person's discharge from probation or at any 25time thereafter, the committing court may enter an order 26certifying that the sentence has been satisfactorily completed   HB1288- 6 -LRB104 07349 RLC 17389 b1when the court believes it would assist in the rehabilitation 2of the person and be consistent with the public welfare. Such 3order may be entered upon the motion of the defendant or the 4State or upon the court's own motion.5    (f) Upon entry of the order, the court shall issue to the 6person in whose favor the order has been entered a certificate 7stating that his behavior after conviction has warranted the 8issuance of the order.9    (g) This Section shall not affect the right of a defendant 10to collaterally attack his conviction or to rely on it in bar 11of subsequent proceedings for the same offense.12    (h) No application for any license specified in subsection 13(i) of this Section granted under the authority of this State 14shall be denied by reason of an eligible offender who has 15obtained a certificate of relief from disabilities, as defined 16in Article 5.5 of this Chapter, having been previously 17convicted of one or more criminal offenses, or by reason of a 18finding of lack of "good moral character" when the finding is 19based upon the fact that the applicant has previously been 20convicted of one or more criminal offenses, unless:21        (1) there is a direct relationship between one or more 22    of the previous criminal offenses and the specific license 23    sought; or24        (2) the issuance of the license would involve an 25    unreasonable risk to property or to the safety or welfare 26    of specific individuals or the general public.  HB1288- 7 -LRB104 07349 RLC 17389 b1    In making such a determination, the licensing agency shall 2consider the following factors:3        (1) the public policy of this State, as expressed in 4    Article 5.5 of this Chapter, to encourage the licensure 5    and employment of persons previously convicted of one or 6    more criminal offenses;7        (2) the specific duties and responsibilities 8    necessarily related to the license being sought;9        (3) the bearing, if any, the criminal offenses or 10    offenses for which the person was previously convicted 11    will have on his or her fitness or ability to perform one 12    or more such duties and responsibilities;13        (4) the time which has elapsed since the occurrence of 14    the criminal offense or offenses;15        (5) the age of the person at the time of occurrence of 16    the criminal offense or offenses;17        (6) the seriousness of the offense or offenses;18        (7) any information produced by the person or produced 19    on his or her behalf in regard to his or her rehabilitation 20    and good conduct, including a certificate of relief from 21    disabilities issued to the applicant, which certificate 22    shall create a presumption of rehabilitation in regard to 23    the offense or offenses specified in the certificate; and24        (8) the legitimate interest of the licensing agency in 25    protecting property, and the safety and welfare of 26    specific individuals or the general public.  HB1288- 8 -LRB104 07349 RLC 17389 b1    (i) A certificate of relief from disabilities shall be 2issued only for a license or certification issued under the 3following Acts:4        (1) the Animal Welfare Act; except that a certificate 5    of relief from disabilities may not be granted to provide 6    for the issuance or restoration of a license under the 7    Animal Welfare Act for any person convicted of violating 8    Section 3, 3.01, 3.02, 3.03, 3.03-1, or 4.01 of the Humane 9    Care for Animals Act or Section 26-5 or 48-1 of the 10    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;11        (2) the Illinois Athletic Trainers Practice Act;12        (3) the Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair Braiding, 13    and Nail Technology Act of 1985;14        (4) the Boiler and Pressure Vessel Repairer Regulation 15    Act;16        (5) the Boxing and Full-contact Martial Arts Act;17        (6) the Illinois Certified Shorthand Reporters Act of 18    1984;19        (7) the Illinois Farm Labor Contractor Certification 20    Act;21        (8) the Registered Interior Designers Act;22        (9) the Illinois Professional Land Surveyor Act of 23    1989;24        (10) the Landscape Architecture Registration Act;25        (11) the Marriage and Family Therapy Licensing Act;26        (12) the Private Employment Agency Act;  HB1288- 9 -LRB104 07349 RLC 17389 b1        (13) the Professional Counselor and Clinical 2    Professional Counselor Licensing and Practice Act;3        (14) the Real Estate License Act of 2000;4        (15) the Illinois Roofing Industry Licensing Act;5        (16) the Professional Engineering Practice Act of 6    1989;7        (17) the Water Well and Pump Installation Contractor's 8    License Act;9        (18) the Electrologist Licensing Act; 10        (19) the Auction License Act;11        (20) the Illinois Architecture Practice Act of 1989;12        (21) the Dietitian Nutritionist Practice Act;13        (22) the Environmental Health Practitioner Licensing 14    Act;15        (23) the Funeral Directors and Embalmers Licensing 16    Code;17        (24) (blank);18        (25) the Professional Geologist Licensing Act;19        (26) the Illinois Public Accounting Act; and20        (27) the Structural Engineering Practice Act of 1989.21(Source: P.A. 102-284, eff. 8-6-21; 103-562, eff. 11-17-23.)